Maine, session 132, LD45.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §1220 is enacted to read:
§1220. Resident Technology Fund
The Resident Technology Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established
in the department as a nonlapsing fund for the purpose of offsetting the cost of technology
provided to residents of correctional facilities.
1. Funds. All funds collected from any fees established by the commissioner pursuant
to section 1403, subsection 14 must be deposited into the fund. The department may accept
money for deposit into the fund from other sources.
2. Use. The fund may be used by the department to offset the cost of buying and
maintaining technology provided to residents of correctional facilities.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §1403, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Technology fee. The commissioner may establish a reasonable fee, as provided
in this subsection, for the use of technology, including, but not limited to, computers, laptop
computers and external storage devices, that is provided to residents of correctional
facilities in connection with educational or vocational programs, remote work or other
purposes. For each calendar month in which the technology is used by a resident, as defined
in section 3015, subsection 1, paragraph B, the fee charged may not exceed 7% of the
resident's earnings during the month after any deductions for court-ordered or statutory
obligations, including, but not limited to, child support, court filing fees, victim restitution,
fines, facility restitution, facility monetary sanctions, medical and dental services fees and
room and board, or $35, whichever is less. The commissioner may not charge a fee under
this subsection for:
A. Technology that is provided to a resident for the purpose of research related to a
criminal case or civil lawsuit in which the resident is involved; or
Page 1 - 132LR0171(04)

B. Technology that is provided to a resident who has earnings of less than $100 during
the calendar month after any deductions that are provided for in this subsection.
Money received by the resident and directly deposited into a telephone call account
established by the department under section 3039, subsection 4 for the sole purpose of
paying for use of the department's client telephone system is not subject to this subsection.
Money received by the resident as a credit improvement loan in accordance with section
3039, subsection 6 is not subject to this subsection.
A correctional facility shall collect any fees received under this subsection and deposit them
into the Resident Technology Fund established in section 1220.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Resident Technology Fund N383
Initiative: Establishes the Resident Technology Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $38,598 $38,598
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,598 $38,598
Page 2 - 132LR0171(04)